grammar/big-grammar/big.grammar.foma
read lexc big.ur.lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;

source features.foma

define alph [a|b|d|d͡ʒ|e|f|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|t͡ʃ|u|v|w|z|ð|ŋ|ɔ|ə|ɛ|ɡ|ɣ|ɲ|ɾ|ʃ|ʎ|ʒ|β];

# Composite features
define +dor %-syl & [ %+hi | %+lo | %+back ];
define +pal %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %-back ];
define +vel %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %+back ];
define +plos [ %-son & %-cont & %-delrel ];
define +fric [ %-son & %+cont ];
define +approx [ %+son & %-nas ];
define -approx [ ~%+approx | ɾ ];
define +strid [ʃ | s | z | ʒ];
define +rho [%-syl & %+son & %+cons & %+ant & %+cont & %-lat];

# Word final sonorant consonantal deletion, /n r/
# Only on stressed syllables, not following /r/
# Still exceptions:
#   - not monosyllabic?
define TapDeletion ɾ -> 0 || _ .#.;
define NasalDeletion n -> 0 || 1[alph*][\%+rho] _ .#.;

# [ %-approx & %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] -> 0
define SonCorDeletion TapDeletion .o. NasalDeletion;

# Tap becomes a trill before stops.
# Placing this after InterConFrication to avoid e.g.
#   - ʃəm-1bɛɾɡ+Fem ʃəm-1bɛr-ɣə
# but maybe sensitivity to syllable boundary would be more correct?
define PreStopTrill ɾ -> r || _%+plos;

# Sometimes word final rhotic tap becomes trill instead of being deleted
define Trill ɾ -> r || 1[alpha*][%+round] _ .#.;

# Adjacent homorganic cons deletion
define HomCorDeletion [ %-syl & %+cor ] -> 0 || [\%+rho & %+cons & %+cor & %+son ] _ .#.;
define HomDorDeletion [ %-syl & %+dor ] -> 0 || [ %+cons & %+dor & %+son ] _ .#.;

define HomDeletion HomCorDeletion .o. HomDorDeletion;

# Nasal place assimilation
# Also, by specifying -ant we're predicting h and t͡ʃ, but maybe that makes sense.
define AnteriorAssim n -> ɲ || _ [ %-ant ];
define VelarAssim n -> ŋ || _ [ %+vel ];
define NasalPlaceAssim VelarAssim .o. AnteriorAssim;

# Vocalic deletion: vowels followed by word-final vowels are deleted, with a few exceptions.
define VocDeletion [ %+syl & %+back] -> 0 || _ [ %+syl ] .#.;

define VocDeletionExceptions [
    [{nu}   "+Fem" .x. {nuə}] |
    [{kru}  "+Fem" .x. {kruə}]
];

# Stressed word final lenition of [ ɛ | b ] -> uw
# Has to precede WordFinObstruentDevoicing
define WordFinStressedLenition b -> uw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Needs to go before SonCorDeletion to avoid e.g.
#   - mi-u-1sɛn+Masc    mi-u-1sɛuw
define WordFinStressedLengthening ɛ -> ɛuw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Word final obstruent devoicing
define WordFinObstruentDevoicing  ɡ -> k,
                                  d -> t,
                                  b -> p,
                                  z -> s || _ .#.;

# Word final affrication
# [+fric] -> [-cont, +delrel]
define WordFinAffrication ʒ -> t͡ʃ,
                          ð -> d͡ʒ || _ .#.;

# Voiced stops become (continuant) fricatives in between sonorant continuants
# [ %+plos & %+voi ] -> [ %+cont ] || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ]
define InterConFrication ɡ -> ɣ,
                         d -> ð,
                         b -> β || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ];

# ɔ -> o when stressed
define StressedVowelHeightening ɛ -> e, ɔ -> o || 1[alph*] _;

define StressedVowelLowering e -> ɛ, o -> ɔ || 1[alph*] _ "ks", 1[alph*];

# primitive re-syllabification of word ending with attached schwa, when
# preceding phone doesn't follow a stop
define Syllabify0 [ %-syl ] -> %- ... || [\%-][ %+son | %+cont ] _ [%+syl] .#.;
define Syllabify1 [ %+syl ] -> %- ... || [%+syl & %-back] _ .#.;
define Syllabify Syllabify0 .o. Syllabify1;

define glide [ %+son & %+cont & %-cons & %-syl];
define GlideFinalVocalization glide -> i || ɾ _ .#.;

define VelFinalWEpen [%+vel] -> ... w || _ .#.;

# Surely there will be more.
define Exceptions VocDeletionExceptions;

define Grammar Lexicon
#   .o. NasalPlaceAssim             # never gets a chance, because URs are not really URs
#   .o. Trill
#   .o. Flap
#   .o. StressedVowelHeightening
#   .o. StressedVowelLowering
#   .o. VelFinalWEpen
    .o. WordFinStressedLengthening
    .o. SonCorDeletion
    .o. HomDeletion
    .o. WordFinStressedLenition
    .o. WordFinObstruentDevoicing
    .o. WordFinAffrication
    .o. InterConFrication
    .o. PreStopTrill
    .o. GlideFinalVocalization
    .o. VocDeletion
    .o. Syllabify
    ;

define Grammar [Exceptions .P. Grammar];
